Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [135A.1367] OPIATE ANTAGONIST. new text end new text begin (a) The Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities shall, and the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota is requested to: new text end new text begin (1) maintain a supply of opiate antagonists, as defined in section 604A.04, subdivision 1, at each campus site to be administered in compliance with section 151.37, subdivision 12; and new text end new text begin (2) have at least two doses of a nasal opiate antagonist available on site at each campus residential building. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of health shall identify resources, including at least one training video, to help postsecondary institutions implement an opiate antagonist emergency response and make the resources available for institutions. new text end new text begin (c) The Board of Trustees and the Board of Regents may adopt a model plan for use, storage, and administration of opiate antagonists on system campuses. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning in the 2025-2026 academic year. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.37, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Administration of opiate antagonists for drug overdose. (a) A licensed physician, a licensed advanced practice registered nurse authorized to prescribe drugs pursuant to section 148.235, or a licensed physician assistant may authorize the following individuals to administer opiate antagonists, as defined in section 604A.04, subdivision 1: (1) an emergency medical responder registered pursuant to section 144E.27; (2) a peace officer as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraphs (c) and (d); (3) correctional employees of a state or local political subdivision; (4) staff of community-based health disease prevention or social service programs; (5) a volunteer firefighter; (6) a nurse or any other personnel employed by, or under contract with, new text begin a postsecondary institution or new text end a charter, public, or private school; and (7) transit rider investment program personnel authorized under section 473.4075. (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, opiate antagonists may be administered by one of these individuals only if: (1) the licensed physician, licensed physician assistant, or licensed advanced practice registered nurse has issued a standing order to, or entered into a protocol with, the individual; and (2) the individual has training in the recognition of signs of opiate overdose and the use of opiate antagonists as part of the emergency response to opiate overdose. (c) Nothing in this section prohibits the possession and administration of naloxone pursuant to section 604A.04. (d) Notwithstanding section 148.235, subdivisions 8 and 9, a licensed practical nurse is authorized to possess and administer according to this subdivision an opiate antagonist in a school setting.